Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 1.5
HELP AMERICA VOTE ACT

Cross references:

For the federal "Help America Vote Act of 2002", see Pub.L. 107-252, codified at 42 U.S.C. sec. 15301 et seq.

Section

1-1.5-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

The "Help America Vote Act of 2002", Pub.L. 107-252, was passed by the United States congress and signed into law by president George W. Bush on October 29, 2002.

HAVA resulted from a national consensus that the nation's electoral system needs improvements to ensure that every eligible voter has the opportunity to vote, that every vote that should be counted will be counted, and that no legal vote will be canceled by a fraudulent vote.

HAVA clearly defines the rights and privileges of those eligible individuals who seek to vote, including all overseas and military service voters, and seeks to prevent disenfranchisement resulting from mistaken determinations of ineligibility to vote, the use of outdated voting systems that are unreliable or insufficiently accessible for disabled voters, or unnecessary administrative obstacles.

To achieve these purposes, HAVA authorizes significant amounts of federal financial assistance to the states to finance the purchase of more reliable voting systems and mandates changes in the conduct of federal elections in all states for the purposes of ensuring greater access to the polls by individuals with disabilities, providing more information to individuals who wish to vote, improving the training of poll workers, and reducing the possibility of fraud in the electoral process.

As a condition of the receipt of certain funds from the federal government under HAVA, section 253 (b)(5) of HAVA requires the states to appropriate funds for carrying out the activities for which such payments are made in an amount equal to five percent of the total amount to be spent for such activities.

HAVA empowers the United States department of justice to bring civil actions seeking such declaratory and injunctive relief as may be necessary to carry out uniform and nondiscriminatory election technology and administration requirements. Accordingly, failure to satisfy the requirements of HAVA may subject election laws and procedures of this state to stringent review and approval by the United States department of justice.

In order that its requirements may be effectively and uniformly implemented, HAVA mandates a greater role for the state governments and, in particular, the chief election official of each state, in overseeing and coordinating elections and in enforcing and implementing uniform standards in elections.

In Colorado, the secretary of state is the chief state election official and, in that capacity, is charged by HAVA and existing state statutory provisions with responsibility for supervising the conduct of elections and for enforcing and implementing the provisions of HAVA and of this code.

Now, therefore, by enacting this article, the general assembly intends to:

Begin the process of implementing the changes in this code that are required by HAVA;

Ensure the timely fulfillment by the state of all requirements for eligibility under HAVA to be able to receive appropriated federal funds under HAVA; and

Provide the secretary of state with sufficient authority to ensure that the state of Colorado is fully compliant with all requirements imposed upon it pursuant to HAVA.

The general assembly further intends that this article be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes as expressed in this section.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 2065, § 7, effective May 22.

1-1.5-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department" means the Colorado department of state.

"Fund" means the federal elections assistance fund created in section 1-1.5-106.

"HAVA" means the federal "Help America Vote Act of 2002", 52 U.S.C. 20901 et seq.

"Secretary" means the Colorado secretary of state.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 2067, § 7, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 1186, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 567, § 5, effective May 18.

1-1.5-103. Conflict with federal law.

If the secretary or a court of competent jurisdiction determines there is a conflict between this article or any other provision of this code and any provision of HAVA, the provisions of HAVA and any rules promulgated thereunder shall control, and the secretary shall perform the duties and discharge the obligations contained in the federal act. If such a determination is made, the secretary shall submit a report to the general assembly explaining the conflict and suggesting language to change this article in the next legislative session.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 2067, § 7, effective May 22.

1-1.5-104. Powers and duties of secretary of state.

The secretary may exercise such powers and perform such duties as reasonably necessary to ensure that the state is compliant with all requirements imposed upon it pursuant to HAVA to be eligible on a timely basis for all federal funds made available to the state under HAVA, including, without limitation, the power and duty to:

Develop and require education and training programs and related services for state, county, and local election officials involved in the conduct of elections;

Promulgate, oversee, and implement changes in the statewide voter registration system as specified in part 3 of article 2 of this title;

Establish a uniform administrative complaint procedure in accordance with the requirements of section 1-1.5-105;

Issue appropriate orders to county or local election officials in connection with the proper administration, implementation, and enforcement of the federal act, which orders shall be enforceable in a court of competent jurisdiction;

Promulgate rules in accordance with the requirements of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as the secretary finds necessary for the proper administration, implementation, and enforcement of HAVA and of this article; and

Exercise any other powers or perform any other duties that are consistent with this article and that are reasonably necessary for the proper administration, implementation, and enforcement of HAVA and that will improve the conduct of elections in the state in conformity with HAVA.

Acting either upon his or her own initiative or upon a complaint submitted to him or her giving the secretary reasonable grounds to believe that an election in this state is not being conducted in accordance with the requirements of HAVA or of this code, the secretary may investigate the allegation of noncompliance. In connection with such an investigation, the secretary may:

Compel the testimony of witnesses and the production of documents from any state, county, or local official involved in the conduct of the election; and

Send one or more official election observers to any county in the state to examine the conduct of any aspect of any election giving rise to the allegation of noncompliance. The clerk and recorder of the county in which the allegation of noncompliance arises shall assume the costs associated with the travel and other expenses of any observers sent to the county pursuant to this subparagraph (II) where the secretary has reasonable grounds to believe that the election is not being conducted in accordance with the requirements of HAVA or of this code.

In order to satisfy the requirements of this subsection (2), the secretary may require that each county designate not less than three persons experienced in the conduct of elections to form a pool of official election observers.

With the exception of a complaint brought under section 1-1.5-105 to remedy an alleged violation of HAVA, any interested party that has reasonable grounds to believe that an election is not being conducted in conformity with the requirements of this code may apply to the district court in the judicial district in which the allegation of noncompliance arises for an order giving the secretary access to all pertinent election records used in conducting the election and requesting the secretary to conduct the election.

The secretary shall seek the full amount of funds available to the state under HAVA for distribution to the counties in accordance with HAVA.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 2067, § 7, effective May 22.

L. 2005:

(4) added, p. 1394, § 4, effective June 6; (4) added, p. 1429, § 4, effective June 6.

1-1.5-105. Complaint procedure.

Subject to the requirements of this section, in accordance with section 402 of HAVA, the secretary may establish by rule a uniform administrative complaint procedure to remedy grievances brought under Title III of HAVA.

Any rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must provide for, but need not be limited to, the following:

A uniform and nondiscriminatory complaint procedure;

Authorization for any person who believes that there is a violation of Title III of HAVA, including a violation that has occurred, is occurring, or that is about to occur, to file a complaint;

A description by the complainant in his or her complaint of the alleged violation with particularity and a reference to the section of HAVA alleged to have been violated;

A requirement that the complaint be filed no later than one year from the date of either the occurrence of the alleged violation or of the election giving rise to the complaint, whichever is later;

A requirement that each complaint be in writing and notarized, signed, and sworn by the person filing the complaint;

Authorization for the secretary to consolidate two or more complaints;

At the request of the complainant, a hearing on the record;

Authorization for the secretary to provide an appropriate remedy if the secretary determines that any provision of Title III of HAVA has been violated or to dismiss the complaint and publish the results of his or her review if the secretary determines that no provision of Title III of HAVA has been violated;

A final determination on the complaint by the secretary prior to the expiration of the ninety-day period that begins on the date the complaint is filed, unless the complainant consents to an extension of time for making such determination;

Resolution of the complaint within sixty days under an alternative dispute resolution procedure that the secretary shall establish in accordance with the requirements of this section if the secretary fails to satisfy the applicable deadline specified in paragraph (i) of this subsection (2), and the availability of the record and any other materials from any proceedings conducted under the complaint procedures established for use under such alternative dispute resolution procedures;

Authorization for the secretary to conduct a preliminary review of any complaint submitted to him or her and to dismiss any complaint that he or she finds is not supported by credible evidence; and

Recovery by the secretary of the costs of the proceeding against any complainant who files a complaint that, in connection with the final determination by the secretary pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection (2), is found, on the basis of clear and convincing evidence, to be frivolous, groundless, or vexatious.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

No complaint shall be brought pursuant to the procedure created by this section unless the complaint alleges a violation of Title III of HAVA;

Proceedings for the resolution of a complaint brought pursuant to this section shall not be considered an adjudication under article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.; and

The procedures created by this section shall constitute the exclusive administrative remedy for a violation of Title III of HAVA.

Any person aggrieved by a final determination by the secretary acting pursuant to paragraph (i) of subsection (2) of this section may appeal the secretary's determination to the district court in and for the city and county of Denver within thirty days of the date of the determination.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 2069, § 7, effective May 22.

L. 2016:

IP(2) and (2)(b) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 567, § 6, effective May 18.

1-1.5-106. Federal elections assistance fund - match requirements - maintenance of effort - grants and loans to counties.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the federal elections assistance fund, which fund shall be administered by the secretary and shall consist of:

All moneys received by the state from the federal government pursuant to HAVA;

All moneys appropriated or otherwise made available to the fund by the general assembly for the purpose of carrying out the activities required by HAVA;

All moneys received by the state as payment from the counties pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;

Moneys collected by the secretary for the implementation of this article from federal grants and other contributions, grants, bequests, and donations received from individuals, private organizations, or foundations; and

Interest earned on deposits made to the fund.

All moneys specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be credited to the fund.

Any moneys received by the state from the federal government pursuant to HAVA shall be used by the state only for the purposes specified by the provisions of HAVA under which the moneys were provided.

All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department for the proper administration, implementation, and enforcement of HAVA in accordance with the requirements of this article. All moneys in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall be retained in the fund and shall not revert to the general fund or any other fund.

Subject to available appropriations, the secretary may direct that moneys in the department of state cash fund created in section 24-21-104 (3)(b), C.R.S., as of July 1, 2003, be used to satisfy in whole or in part the requirement of section 253 (b)(5) of HAVA that the state appropriate funds for carrying out the activities for which federal payments are being made in an amount equal to five percent of the total amount to be spent for such activities. In order to assist the state in satisfying this requirement of HAVA, the secretary may assess the counties for a share of the financial requirement assessed against the state under HAVA as specified in this subsection (3) and may establish by rule a plan to fairly and reasonably allocate the financial obligation among the counties pursuant to this subsection (3).

For the 2002-03 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter in which the state receives payments from the federal government in accordance with Title I of HAVA, and subject to available appropriations, the general assembly shall make an annual appropriation to the department out of moneys in the department of state cash fund for election-related purposes that is not less than the level of expenditures for such purposes maintained by the state for the 2001-02 fiscal year.

For the 2002-03 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter in which the state receives payments from the federal government in accordance with Title I of HAVA, and subject to available appropriations, the secretary shall maintain out of moneys in the department of state cash fund a level of expenditures in support of the statewide voter registration system created in section 1-2-301 that is not less than the level of expenditures for such purposes maintained by the secretary for the 2001-02 fiscal year.

For the county fiscal year that ends prior to November 1, 2003, and for each county fiscal year thereafter in which the state receives payments from the federal government in accordance with Title I of HAVA, each county shall maintain not less than the same amount of expenditures on activities arising under Title III of HAVA that it expended on such activities for its fiscal year ending prior to November 2002, excluding moneys expended during that period for capital expenditures on new voting equipment or any other one-time capital expenditure as determined by the secretary.

The secretary may establish a program pursuant to which the secretary may award grants or loans to the counties for the purpose of assisting the counties in meeting any of the requirements imposed upon them pursuant to HAVA or by this article. In connection with the establishment of any such program created pursuant to this subsection (7), the secretary shall specify, without limitation, qualification requirements for eligibility to receive a grant or loan, administration of the grant or loan program, criteria for awarding a grant or loan, any limit on the total amount of moneys to be awarded in a grant or loan pursuant to the requirements of this subsection (7), any limit on the amount to be awarded to any one grant or loan recipient, auditing or reporting requirements for grant or loan recipients, penalty provisions where grant or loan moneys are expended improperly, and, in the case of loans, repayment terms. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each loan awarded pursuant to this subsection (7) shall bear interest at a specified rate.

In response to the failure by a county to satisfy any of the requirements imposed upon it pursuant to this section, the secretary may deduct from the reimbursement to which the county would ordinarily be entitled pursuant to section 1-5-505.5 the amount of moneys owed by the county pursuant to this section.

Any county may donate to the state equipment for voter registration purposes in accordance with part 3 of article 2 of this title, which equipment is determined to be usable by the secretary. In exchange for such donation, the county shall receive a credit in the amount of the fair market value of the item donated against the financial obligation assessed against the county pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 2070, § 7, effective May 22.